Washington statutes.
RCW 15.100.130

Deposit of moneys collected—Appropriation not required.

The commission shall deposit moneys collected under RCW 15.100.110 in a separate account in the name of the commission in any bank that is a state depositary. All expenditures and disbursements made from this account under this chapter may be made without the necessity of a specific legislative appropriation. RCW 43.01.050 does not apply to this account or to the moneys received, collected, or expended under this chapter.

[ 2001 c 314 s 13.]